Washington statutes.
RCW 7.68.063

Beneficiaries' application for compensation.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

Where death results from injury the parties eligible for compensation under this chapter, or someone in their behalf, shall make application for the same to the department, which application must be accompanied with proof of death and proof of relationship showing the parties to be eligible for compensation under this chapter, certificates of attending physician or licensed *advanced registered nurse practitioner, if any, and such proof as required by the rules of the department.

[2011 c 346 s 303.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The term "advanced registered nurse practitioner" was changed to "advanced practice registered nurse" by 2024 c 239 s 1, effective June 30, 2027.

Intent—Retroactive application—Effective date—2011 c 346: See notes following RCW 7.68.020.